en: Papayas, papaya, papaw, pawpaw
af: papaja
ak: Bofr3
am: ፓፓያ
ar: ببايا
az: papayya
bg: папая
bh: पपीता
bi: popo
bm: manje
bn: পেঁপে
bo: སེ་ཡབ།
bs: papaja
ca: papaie, papaies
ch: papaya
cs: papája
da: papaja
de: Papayas
ee: adiba
eo: papajo
es: Papayas
et: papaia
eu: papaia
fa: پاپایا
fi: papaija
fj: weleti
fr: Papayes, papaye
gl: papaia
gn: mamóne
gu: પપૈયું
ha: gwanda
he: פפאיה
hi: पपीता
hr: papaje, papaja
ht: papay
hu: papaja
hy: Պապայա
ia: papaya
id: Pepaya
io: Papayo
is: sólaldin, papaya
it: papaia, papaya
ja: パパイア
jv: katès
kg: dilolo
kk: papaýya, Папайя, پاپاييا
kn: ಪಪ್ಪಾಯಿ
ko: 파파야
kv: папайя
la: Carica papaya
lg: eppaapaali
ln: Payipayi
lo: ໝາກຫຸ່ງ
lt: papaja, papajos
lv: papaja
mg: papay
mi: papaia, папаја
ml: പപ്പായ
mr: पपई
ms: betik, بتيق
my: သင်္ဘောပင်
nb: papaya
nl: Papajas, papayas
no: papaya
nv: babáayah
oc: papaia
or: ଅମୃତଭଣ୍ଡା
pl: papają
pt: mamão, papaia, ababaia
qu: papaya
ro: papaya
ru: папайя
rw: ipapaya
sa: मधुकर्कटी
sg: päpâyë
sh: papaja
sk: papája
sl: papaja
so: babaay
sr: papaja
sv: papaya, papaja
sw: mpapai
ta: பப்பாளி
te: బొప్పాయి
th: มะละกอ
tl: papaya
to: lesi
tr: papaya
ts: mpopowa
ty: ’ī’ītā
uk: папая
ur: پپیتا
vi: đu đủ
wo: pàppaaya
za: moeggva
zh: 番木瓜

en: Fresh papayas
fr: Papayes fraîches
hr: Svježe papaje
lt: Šviežios papajos

en: Papaya pulp
fr: Pulpe de papaye

en: Frozen papayas
fr: Papayes surgelées

en: Passion fruits, Passionfruits
de: Passionsfrüchte, Maracujas, Marakujas, Maracujás
es: Maracuyás, Frutas de la pasión
fr: Fruits de la passion, Maracudjas
hr: Marakuje
la: Passiflora edulis
lt: Pasifloros vaisiai
nl: Passievruchten

en: Passion fruit pulp and pips
fr: Pulpe et pépins de fruits de la passion, Pulpe et pépins de maracudja

en: Pineapples, Pineapple
ak: Aborɔbɛ
ar: أناناس
ay: Achupalla
bg: Ананас
bo: ཐང་འབྲས།
ca: Pinya
cs: Ananas
cy: Pîn-afal
da: Ananasser, Ananas
de: Ananas, Ananasse
dv: އަލަނާސި
ee: Abable
eo: Ananasoj
es: Piñas, Ananás
eu: Anana
fi: Ananas
fr: Ananas
gd: Anann
ha: Abarba
hr: Ananas
ig: Ọkwụrụ bekee
io: Ananaso
is: Ananas
it: Ananas
ja: パイナップル, パインアップル
kg: Nanasi
la: Ananas comosus, Ananas sativus
lb: Ananas
lo: ໝາກນັດ
lt: Ananasai, Ananasas
lv: Ananass
ms: Nenas
my: နာနတ်
nb: Ananaser
nl: Ananassen
nn: Ananasar
nv: Bilasáana diwozhí
pl: Ananas
pt: Abacaxi
ro: Ananas
ru: Ананас
rw: Inanasi
sd: انناس
se: Anánas
sk: Ananás
sl: Ananas
sm: Pineapu
sq: Ananasi
sv: Ananaser, Ananas
te: అనాస పండు
uk: Ананас
ur: انناس
yi: אנאנאס
za: Bohloz
zh: 鳳梨

en: Fresh pineapple
da: Frisk ananas
de: Frische Ananas
fr: Ananas frais
hr: Svježi ananas
lt: Švieži ananasai
nl: Verse ananas
sv: Färska ananaser

en: Pineapple pulps, Pineapple pulp
fr: Pulpe d'ananas
hr: Pulpa ananasa
nl: Ananaspulp

en: Pineapple slices
ar: شرائح الأناناس
ca: Tall de pinya
da: Ananasskiver
de: Ananasscheibe
fi: Ananasviipaleet
fr: Ananas en tranches
nl: Ananasschijfje
ru: Ломтики ананаса
sv: Ananasskivor
zh: 鳳梨片

en: Jujube dates, Jujube
fr: Jujube, datte rouge, datte chinoise

en: Durian
fr: Durian

en: Dried Durian
fr: Durian séché

en: Frozen fruits
da: Frosne frugter
de: Gefrorene Früchte
es: Frutas congeladas
fi: hedelmäpakasteet
fr: Fruits surgelés
hr: Smrznuto voće
it: Frutta surgelata, Frutta congelata
lt: Šaldyti vaisiai
nl: Bevroren fruit
pl: Owoce mrożone
sv: Frysta frukter

en: Frozen fruits with added sugar
fr: Fruits surgelés avec sucres ajoutés
hr: Smrznuto voće s dodatkom šećera
lt: Cukruoti šaldyti vaisiai, Šaldyti vaisiai su cukrumi

en: Frozen berries
da: Frosne bær
de: Gefrorene Beeren
es: Frutas del bosque congeladas, Frutos rojos congelados
fi: pakastemarjat
fr: Fruits rouges surgelés
hr: Smrznuto bobičasto voće
it: Frutti di bosco surgelati, Frutti di bosco congelati
lt: Šaldytos uogos
nl: Diepvries bosvruchten, Bevroren bosvruchten
sv: Frysta bär

en: Frozen blackberries
es: Moras congeladas
fr: Mûres surgelées, Mûres de ronce surgelées
hr: Smrznute kupine
lt: Šaldytos gervuogės
nl: Bramen (diepvries), Diepvries bramen, Bevroren bramen

en: Frozen blueberries, Frozen blueberry
da: Frosne blåbær
de: Tiefkühl-Heidelbeeren, Tiefkühl-Blaubeeren
es: Arándanos congelados
fi: Pakastemustikat
fr: Myrtilles surgelées, Myrtille surgelée
hr: Smrznute borovnice
it: Mirtilli surgelati
lt: Šaldytos mėlynės
nl: Bosbessen (diepvries), Bevroren bosbessen
sv: Frysta blåbär

en: Frozen raspberries, Frozen red raspberries
da: Frosne hindbær
de: Gefrorene Himbeeren
es: Frambuesas congeladas
fi: Pakastevadelmat
fr: Framboises surgelées
hr: Smrznute maline
it: Lamponi congelati
lt: Šaldytos avietės
nl: Frambozen (diepvries), Bevroren frambozen
sv: Frysta hallon

en: Frozen redcurrants
es: Grosellas congeladas
fr: Groseilles surgelées
hr: Smrznuti crveni ribizli
lt: Šaldyti raudonieji serbentai
nl: Aalbessen (diepvries), Bevroren aalbessen